src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON h7 ! bræv
 +N+Neu:       S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu:       S_N_SGDG_is ;
 +N+Neu:^ØUML  N_PLNA      ;
 +N+Neu:^ØUML  N_PLD       ;
 +N+Neu:       N_PLG       ;

LEXICON h8 ! land
  h8e    ;
  h_flt8 ;

LEXICON h8e ! land
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt8 ! land
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:       N_PLG  ;

LEXICON h9/10
  h9  ;
  h10 ;

LEXICON h9/kv2
  h9  ;
  kv2 ;

LEXICON h9/41
  h9  ;
  h41 ;

LEXICON h9 ! blikk
  h9e    ;
  h_flt9 ;

LEXICON h9e
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt9
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;

LEXICON h10 ! fall
  h10e    ;
  h_flt10 ;

LEXICON h10e
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt10
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:       N_PLG  ;


LEXICON h11e/22f
  h11e    ;
  h_flt22 ;

LEXICON h_flt22/11e
 h_flt22 ;
 h11e ;

LEXICON h11 ! hús
  h11e    ;
  h_flt11 ;

LEXICON h11e
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt11
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;

LEXICON h12 ! glas
  h12e    ;
  h_flt12 ;

LEXICON h12e
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt12
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:       N_PLG  ;


LEXICON h13 ! setur
  h13e    ;
  h_flt13 ;

LEXICON h13e
 +N+Neu:^EPH S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu:^EPH S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt13
 +N+Neu:^EPH N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:^EPH N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:^EPH N_PLG  ;

LEXICON h13_2 ! ásin
  h13_2e    ;
  h_flt13_2 ;

LEXICON h13_2e
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu:^EPH S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt13_2
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:^EPH N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:^EPH N_PLG  ;


LEXICON h14 ! pistr
  h14e    ;
  h_flt14 ;

LEXICON h14e
 +N+Neu:r  S_N_SGNA  ;
 +N+Neu:r  S_N_SGD_i ;
 +N+Neu:ur S_N_SGG_s ;


LEXICON h_flt14
 +N+Neu:r N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:r N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:r N_PLG  ;


LEXICON h15 ! tjaldur
  h15e ;
  h_flt15 ;

LEXICON h15e
+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:ur  Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:rið Neu_Flag  ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:ur  Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:rið Neu_Flag  ;
             +N+Neu:r   S_N_SGD_i ;
             +N+Neu:ur  S_N_SGG_s ;

LEXICON h_flt15
+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>ur   Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:^UUML%>rini Neu_Flag  ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:^UUML%>ur   Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:^UUML%>rini Neu_Flag  ;
			 +N+Neu:^UUML%>r    N_PLD     ;
			 +N+Neu:r           N_PLG     ;

! Start here.
LEXICON h16 ! skýggj
  h16e    ;
  h_flt16 ;

LEXICON h16e
 			  +N+Neu:        	 S_N_SGNA  ;
			  +N+Neu:^JI    	 S_N_SGD_i ; ! skýggi
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: 			 Neu_Flag  ; ! skýggj
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:^GGDEL%>num Neu_Flag  ; ! skýnum
			  +N+Neu:^GGDEL		 S_N_SGG_s ; ! skýs

LEXICON h_flt16
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;

LEXICON h16_2 ! hoyggj
  h16_2e ;
  h_flt16_2 ;
  
LEXICON h16_2e
			  +N+Neu:        	 S_N_SGNA  ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^JI%>i	 	 Neu_Flag  ; ! hoyggi
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: 			 Neu_Flag  ; ! hoyggj
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:^GGDEL%>num Neu_Flag  ; ! hoynum
			  +N+Neu:^GGDEL		 S_N_SGG_s ; ! hoys

LEXICON h_flt16_2
  h_flt16 ;
  
LEXICON h16_3 ! fríggj
  h16_3e ;
  h_flt16_3 ;
  
LEXICON h16_3e
+N+Neu:        	 S_N_SGNA  ;
			  +N+Neu:^JI    	 S_N_SGD_i ; ! fríggi, frígginum
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: 			 Neu_Flag  ; ! fríggj
			  +N+Neu:^GGDEL		 S_N_SGG_s ; ! frís
			  
LEXICON h_flt16_3
  h_flt16 ;
  

LEXICON h17 ! kríggj
  h17e    ;
  h_flt17 ;

LEXICON h17e 
 			  +N+Neu:       S_N_SGNA  ;
			  +N+Neu:^JI    S_N_SGD_i ; ! skríggi, skrígginum
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:   	Neu_Flag  ; ! skríggj
			  +N+Neu:^GDEL  S_N_SGG_s ; ! skrígs

LEXICON h_flt17
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;

LEXICON h17_2
 h17_2e ;
 h_flt17 ;

LEXICON h17_2e
 			  +N+Neu:       	S_N_SGNA  ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^JI%>i  	Neu_Flag  ; ! kríggi
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:   		Neu_Flag  ; ! kríggj
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:^GDEL%>num Neu_Flag  ; ! krígnum
			  +N+Neu:^GDEL 		S_N_SGG_s ; ! krígs



LEXICON h18 ! týggi
  h18e    ;
  h_flt18 ;

LEXICON h18e
 +N+Neu:i 0_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:i   		Neu_Flag  ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:j   		Neu_Flag  ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:inum   		Neu_Flag  ;
 +N+Neu:%>is S_N_SGG ;

LEXICON h_flt18
 +N+Neu:  N_PLNA_i_ir ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLG  ;


LEXICON h19 ! prógv
  h19e    ;
  h_flt19 ;

LEXICON h19e
 			  +N+Neu: 			S_N_SGNA ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:i   		Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:^GDEL%>num Neu_Flag ;
 			  +N+Neu:^GDEL%>s 	S_N_SGG  ;

LEXICON h_flt19
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;


LEXICON h20 ! búgv
  h20e    ;
  h_flt20 ;

LEXICON h20e
 			 +N+Neu:        	S_N_SGNA  ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:i   		Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:^GVDEL%>num Neu_Flag  ;
 			 +N+Neu:^GVDEL 		S_N_SGG_s ;

LEXICON h_flt20
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;


LEXICON h21 ! plógv
  h21e    ;
  h_flt21 ;

LEXICON h21e
 			  +N+Neu: 			S_N_SGNA  ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:i   		Neu_Flag  ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:^VDEL%>num Neu_Flag  ;
			  +N+Neu:^VDEL 		S_N_SGG_s ;

LEXICON h_flt21
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;


LEXICON h22 ! ber
  h22e    ;
  h_flt22 ;

LEXICON h22e
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt22
 +N+Neu:  N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:  N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLG  ;


LEXICON h23 ! egg
  h23e    ;
  h_flt23 ;

LEXICON h23e
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt23
 +N+Neu:  N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:  N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLG  ;

LEXICON h24 ! kvæði
  h24e     ;
  h_flt24 ;

LEXICON h24e
 +N+Neu: i_N_SGNA   ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGD_i  ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt24
  +N+Neu:  N_PLNA_i_ir ;
  +N+Neu:  N_PLD       ;
  +N+Neu:  N_PLG       ;


LEXICON h25 ! merki
  h25e    ;
  h_flt25 ;

LEXICON h25e
 +N+Neu: i_N_SGNA   ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGD_i  ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt25
 +N+Neu:  N_PLNA_i_ir ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLD  	  ;
 +N+Neu:j N_PLG  	  ;

LEXICON h_flt26 ! tiðindi
  h_flt24 ;

LEXICON h_flt27 ! systkin
+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:in  Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:ini Neu_Flag  ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:in  Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:ini Neu_Flag  ;
   			 +N+Neu:j 	N_PLD  	  ;
 			 +N+Neu:in 	N_PLG     ;


LEXICON h28 ! bakarí
  h28e    ;
  h_flt28 ;

LEXICON h28e
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA  ; !bakarí
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGD   ; ! bakarí
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGD_i ; ! bakaríi
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGG_s ; ! bakarís

LEXICON h_flt28
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;


LEXICON h29 ! kamar
  h29e    ;
  h_flt29 ;

LEXICON h29e
 +N+Neu:ar S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu:ar S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt29
+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>ur   Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:^UUML%>rini Neu_Flag  ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:^UUML%>ur   Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:^UUML%>rini Neu_Flag  ;
			 +N+Neu:^UUML%>r    N_PLD     ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>urum Neu_Flag  ;
 			 +N+Neu:ar 			N_PLG     ;

LEXICON h30 ! summar
			  +N+Neu:mar 	 S_N_SGNA  ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:ri   	 Neu_Flag  ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:rinum 	 Neu_Flag  ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:marinum Neu_Flag  ;
 			  +N+Neu:mar 	 S_N_SGG_s ;
 			  +N+Neu:mur 	 N_PLNA    ;
 			  +N+Neu:mør 	 N_PLNA    ;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:rini 	 Neu_Flag  ;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:rini 	 Neu_Flag  ;
 			  +N+Neu:r 		 N_PLD     ;
 			  +N+Neu:r 		 N_PLG     ;


LEXICON h31 ! nummar
 			+N+Neu:mar 	 S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:rinum Neu_Flag    ;
 			+N+Neu:mar   S_N_SGDG_is ;
 			+N+Neu:mar   N_PLNA      ;
 			+N+Neu:mur   N_PLNA      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:rini  Neu_Flag    ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:rini  Neu_Flag    ;
		    +N+Neu:r 	 N_PLD       ;
 		    +N+Neu:r 	 N_PLG       ;


LEXICON h32 ! høvd
 +N+Neu:d  S_N_SGNA  ;
 +N+Neu:d  S_N_SGD_i ;
 +N+Neu:uð S_N_SGG_s ;
 +N+Neu:d  N_PLNA    ;
 +N+Neu:d  N_PLD     ;
 +N+Neu:d  N_PLG     ;
