src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Shortnouns 
nes+CmpNP/None:nes h11e/22f ;
vil+CmpNP/None:vil h_flt22 ;
LEXICON Nouns
lógvaklapp:lógva#klapp h9/10 ;
fall:fall h10 ;
krampaanfall:krampa#an#fall h10 ;
faldfjøll:faldfjøll h_flt10 ;
alnartjógv:alnartjógv h20 ;
trotabúgv:trotabúgv h20 ;
midsummar:mid#sum h30 ;
brimsummar:brim#sum h30 ;
bluss:bluss h11 ;
fjarljós:fjarljós h11 ;
lærarahús:lærarahús h_flt11 ;
randarhús:randarhús h_flt11 ;
plógv:plógv h21 ;
syllaplógv:syllaplógv h21 ;
telefonnummar:telefon#num h31 ;
røðilsnummar:røðils#num h31 ;
brilluglas:brilluglas h12 ;
tannagras:tannagras h12 ;
mýrisnípugras:mýrisnípugras h12 ;
saks:saks h_flt11 ; ! XXX check 12?
eygnagløs:eygnagløs h_flt12 ;
summargrøs:summargrøs h_flt12 ;
skapker:skapker h22 ;
trøllhøvd:trøll#høv h32 ;
ærhøvd:ær#høv h32 ;
akurskritt:akurskritt h9/kv2 ;
ásin:ásin h13_2 ;
samdøgur:samdøgur h13 ;
strúkiorkestur:strúkiorkestur h13 ;
lomvigaregg:lomvigaregg h23 ;
bleytegg:bleytegg h23 ;
kisil:kisil h13_2e ;
hóttafall:hótta#fall h10 ;
hall:hall h9/10 ;
desigramm:desi#gramm h9/41 ;
organogramm:organo#gramm h9/41 ;
undirhaldsprogramm:undir#halds#pro#gramm h9/41 ;
herðaklapp:herða#klapp h9/10 ;
himpr:himp h14 ;
glopr:glop h14 ;
granarslupur:granar#slupur h13 ;
kvarnhús:kvarn#hús h11 ;
kolagrús:kola#grús h11e ;
herkvett:her#kvett h9 ;
gásarnev:gásar#nev h22 ;
kavakógv:kava#kógv h19e ;
pústr:púst h14 ;
borðteppi:borðtepp h24 ;
torvarbeiði:torvarbeið h24 ;
kjalingarhoyggj:kjalingar#hoyggj h16_2 ;
kirkjugarðshoyggj:kirkju#garðs#hoyggj h16_2 ;
kylingshoyggj:kylings#hoyggj h16_2 ;
teymaspjaldur:teyma#spjald h15 ;
posaspjaldur:posa#spjald h15 ;
fjørutjaldur:fjøru#tjald h15 ;
bjølghylki:bjølghylk h25 ;
sortudíki:sortudík h25 ;
grasfeingi:gras#feing h25e ;
himmiriki:himmi#rik h25e ;
soltistykki:soltistykki h_flt25 ;
Argir:Argir h_flt25 ;
morberjatræ:morberja#træ h7 ;
slagtræ:slag#træ h7 ;
sedristræ:sedris#træ h7 ;
stroyggj:stroyggj h16_3 ;
reyðflíggj:reyðflíggj h16 ;
fríggj:fríggj h16_3 ;
stormskýggj:stormskýggj h16 ;
slagflýggj:slagflýggj h16 ;
blikufjaðraskýggj:blikufjaðraskýggj h_flt16 ;
fløguskýggj:fløguskýggj h_flt16 ;
týggj:týggj h_flt16 ;
reiggj:reiggj h17 ;
rummarareiggj:rummarareiggj h17 ;
viðsveiggj:viðsveiggj h17 ;
nervakríggj:nerva#kríggj h17_2 ;
verðinskríggj:verðins#kríggj h17_2 ;
spælisystkin:spæli#systk h_flt27 ;
samsystkin:sam#systk h_flt27 ;
skyggi:skygg h18 ;
pýggi:pýgg h18 ;
rossatýggi:rossa#týgg h_flt18 ;
aktýggi:ak#týgg h_flt18 ;
skeldarí:skeldarí h28 ;
reiðarí:reiðarí h28 ;
bátalamb:báta#lamb h8 ;
stavnaband:stavnaband h8 ;
fjallaland:fjallaland h8 ;
sóllond:sóllond h_flt8 ;
eystanlond:eystanlond h_flt8 ;
útlond:útlond h_flt8 ;
skiparaprógv:skiparaprógv h19 ;
fráveruprógv:fráveruprógv h19 ;
loynikamar:loyni#ka2m h29 ;
loftskamar:lofts#ka2m h29 ;
puturhakk:puturhakk h9 ;
leypsskinn:leypsskinn h9 ;
brotaføll:brotaføll h_flt9 ;
sóttrøll:sóttrøll h_flt9 ;
blóðkroppafall:blóðkroppafall h10e ;
hvønnfall:hvønnfall h10e ;
borðfall:borðfall h10e ;
ormatógv:ormatógv h20e ;
rubbitógv:rubbitógv h20e ;
óðamannatos:óðamannatos h11e ;
lágættargrús:lágættargrús h11e ;
slógv:slógv h21e ;
fiskaslógv:fiskaslógv h21e ;
smáknas:smáknas h12e ;
oyrnavaks:oyrnavaks h12e ;
eiturgass:eiturgass h12e ;
felagskyn:felagskyn h22e ;
manskyn:manskyn h22e ;
mjólkarsukur:mjólkarsukur h13e ;
skúraveður:skúraveður h13e ;
frostveður:frostveður h13e ;
slupr:slup h14e ;
ógegni:ó#gegn h24e ;
ørilsi:ørils h24e ;
varraskvaldur:varra#skvald h15e ;
orðaskvaldur:orða#skvald h15e ;
orðskvaldur:orð#skvald h15e ;
tarvahoyggj:tarva#hoyggj h16_2e ;
seingjarhoyggj:seingjar#hoyggj h16_2e ;
bøhoyggj:bø#hoyggj h16_2e ;
royðrarroyggj:royðrar#royggj h16_3e ;
toyggj:toyggj h16e ;
víggj:víggj h16_3e ;
blýggj:blýggj h16e ;
veggjaslýggj:veggjaslýggj h16e ;
matarmýggj:matar#mýggj h16_3e ;
hvalspýggj:hval#spýggj h16_3 ;
smørdeiggj:smørdeiggj h17e ;
blóðmørsdeiggj:blóðmørsdeiggj h17e ;
omanfleyggj:omanfleyggj h17e ;
seiggi:seigg h18e ;
spøkjarí:spøkjarí h28e ;
fiskarí:fiskarí h28e ;
skjútsband:skjútsband h8e ;
málbland:málbland h8e ;
íbland:íbland h8e ;
óhógv:óhógv h19e ;
drabb:drabb h9e ;
írapakk:íra#pakk h9e ;
albann:albann h9e ;
andnes:andnes h_flt22/11e ;
útnes:útnes h_flt22/11e ;
nes:nes h_flt22/11e ;
eirindi:eirind h_flt26 ;
ófrættistíðindi:ófrættistíðind h_flt26 ;
hampingarklæði:hampingarklæð h_flt24 ;
kirkjuklæði:kirkjuklæð h_flt24 ;
